District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0419.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Background Check Adjustments Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. The Criminal Background Checks for the Protection of Children Act of 2004,
effective April 13, 2005 (D.C Law 15-353; D.C. Official Code § 4-1501.01 et seq.), is amended
as follows:
(a) Section 205(c) (D.C. Official Code § 4-1501.05(c)) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “for the Mayor to conduct”
and inserting the phrase “to conduct” in its place.
(2) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the phrase “Mayor of the” and inserting
the phrase “Mayor or the” in its place.
(b) A new section 205b is added to read as follows:
“Sec. 205b. Private entities authorized to conduct background checks.
“(a) The Mayor may authorize a non-governmental entity that is a covered youth services
provider to perform the background check functions and procedures described in sections 203(a),
204, and 205 for the covered youth services provider’s applicants, employees, and volunteers.
“(b) A covered youth services provider authorized to perform criminal background
checks pursuant to this section shall submit all records obtained pursuant to such authorization to
the Mayor for uses consistent with this title.”.
(c) Section 208 (D.C. Official Code § 4-1501.08) is amended as follows:
(1) The lead-in language is amended by striking the phrase “received by the
Mayor shall” and inserting the phrase “received, pursuant to this title, by the Mayor or a private
entity that is a covered child or youth services provider shall” in its place.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(2) Paragraph (4) is amended by striking the phrase “; or” and inserting the phrase
“, including to satisfy a criminal history or traffic records check required by another jurisdiction;
or” in its place.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code§ 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2